Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2518
Occupational therapist; license; application; requirements.

(1) An applicant applying for a license as an occupational therapist shall show to the satisfaction of the department that the applicant:

(a) Has successfully completed the academic requirements of an educational program in occupational therapy recognized by the department and accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting body; and

(b) Has passed an examination as provided in section 38-2520.

(2) If an applicant has been trained as an occupational therapist in a foreign country, the applicant shall:

(a) Present documentation of completion of an educational program in occupational therapy that is substantially equivalent to an approved program accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education or by an equivalent accrediting body as determined by the board;

(b) Present proof of proficiency in the English language; and

(c) Pass an examination as provided in section 38-2520.

(3) Residency in this state shall not be a requirement of licensure. A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or association shall not be licensed as an occupational therapist pursuant to the Occupational Therapy Practice Act.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 34;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 33;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 452;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 194;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 139;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6106;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 858;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 40;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 14.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.